Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 38.24 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, there is created the Washington national guard retention program.(2) The adjutant general shall establish the program to study retention needs, including length of service and critical skills retention. The adjutant general may consider the reenlistment term, conversion to a shortage specialty, and other retention factors to determine the amount of any reenlistment bonus that will encourage members of the Washington national guard to extend their terms of service.(3) The adjutant general shall determine eligibility criteria for the retention program. The criteria must be specified in policy and changes must be published.(4) The adjutant general shall determine the amount of any reenlistment bonus and the schedule to make bonus payments.(5) The state military department must report to the governor and the legislature on retention needs and recommendations at least once every three years, beginning November 1, 2027.--- END ---